Tennessee, session 114, SB2634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-1-106, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e)
(1) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, all public institutions of higher
education in this state shall observe an academic holiday on each general election day.
(2) As used in this subsection (e), "academic holiday" means a cessation of all
academic obligations, such as in-person classes, online classes, asynchronous classes,
exams, quizzes, assignments, or any type of task, duty, or chore that has an effect on a
student's grade or involvement in a class at a public institution of higher education.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2634
012419
- 1 -